Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.035

Printed materials—Department's duties.

When an employer initially files a business license application under chapter 19.02 RCW for the purpose, in whole or in part, of registering to pay industrial insurance taxes, the department must send to the employer any printed material the department recommends or requires the employer to post. Any time the printed material has substantive changes in the information, the department must send a copy to each employer.

[ 2013 c 144 s 39; 2007 c 287 s 2.]